Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.085

Salaries and expenses of employees—Vouchers—Authority to draw on funds—Transfer of moneys.

Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the coordinator. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated by law for the administrative committee and center: PROVIDED, That the senate, house of representatives, and code reviser may authorize the administrative committee and center to draw on funds appropriated by the legislature for related information technology expenses. The senate and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for legislative expenses to the administrative committee and center, in addition to charges made under RCW 44.68.050(2).

[ 2020 c 114 s 14; 2007 c 18 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.